District of Columbia statutes.
29A-301.02

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 266, Pub. L. 87-569, § 2
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 589, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 168(e)(1)
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-301.02.
1981 Ed., § 29-502.
1973 Ed., § 29-1002.